North Carolina, session 2025, SB733.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 103 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 103-19. Tamil Pongal Day.
The fourteenth day of January of each year is designated as Tamil Pongal Day in North
Carolina."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S733-v-1*